Utah statutes.
77-32-402.   Duties of board.
(1)  The board shall:
(a)  establish rules and procedures for the application by counties for
disbursements, and the screening and approval of the applications for monies
from the:
(i)  Indigent Inmate Trust Fund established in Part 5;
(ii)  Indigent Capital Defense Trust Fund established in Part 6; and
(iii)  Indigent Felony Defense Trust Fund established in Part 7;
(b)  receive, screen, and approve or disapprove the application of counties
for disbursements from each fund;
(c)  calculate the amount of the annual contribution to be made to the funds
by each participating county;
(d)  prescribe forms for the application for monies from each fund;
(e)  oversee and approve the disbursement of monies from each fund as provided
in Sections 77-32-401, 77-32-502, 77-32-601, and 77-32-701;
(f)  establish its own rules of procedure, elect its own officers, and appoint
committees of its members and other people as may be reasonable and necessary;
(g)  negotiate, enter into, and administer contracts with legal counsel,
qualified under and meeting the standards consistent with this chapter, to
provide defense counsel services to:
(i)  indigents prosecuted in participating counties for serious offenses in
violation of state law; and
(ii) an indigent inmate who is incarcerated in certain counties.
(2)  The board may provide to the court a list of attorneys qualified under
Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure, Rule 8, with which the board has a
preliminary contract to defend indigent cases for an assigned rate.
